Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.668

Energy conservation—Legislative finding—Declaration.

The legislature finds and declares that the buildings, facilities, equipment, and vehicles owned or leased by state government consume significant amounts of energy and that energy conservation actions, including energy management systems, to provide for efficient energy use in these buildings, facilities, equipment, and vehicles will reduce the costs of state government. In order for the operations of state government to provide the citizens of this state an example of energy use efficiency, the legislature further finds and declares that state government should undertake an aggressive program designed to reduce energy use in state buildings, facilities, equipment, and vehicles within a reasonable period of time. The use of appropriate tree plantings for energy conservation is encouraged as part of this program.

[ 2001 c 214 s 23; 1993 c 204 s 6; 1980 c 172 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2001 c 214: See notes following RCW 80.50.010.

Findings—2001 c 214: See note following RCW 39.35.010.

Findings—1993 c 204: See note following RCW 35.92.390.